v11.dix
<pardef n="kudi/_v">
        <e><p>
                <l>xanu</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xalYu</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiwu</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xaru</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xeV</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xiri</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xeVnu</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xeVvu</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxAneV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxAlYeV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixeV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxAreV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxIya</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxIri</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxeneV</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxeveV</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuvanu</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwAneV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuvalYu</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwAlYeV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwaxeV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuvaru</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwAreV</l>
				<r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwIya</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwIri</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwweneV</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwweveV</l>
                <r><s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
</pardef>

<e lm="kudi"><i>kudi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="sari"><i>sari</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="eru"><i>eru</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="walYi"><i>walYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="wiri"><i>wiri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="nasi"><i>nasi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="puti"><i>puti</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="bili"><i>bili</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="biri"><i>biri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="gidi"><i>gidi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="kEhidi"><i>kEhidi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="kuni"><i>kuni</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="sidi"><i>sidi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="baggubadi"><i>baggubadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mIsalalYi"><i>mIsalalYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="muKamuri"><i>muKamuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hallukiri"><i>hallukiri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mUgumuri"><i>mUgumuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mUleVhidi"><i>mUleVhidi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mEmuri"><i>mEmuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="agi"><i>agi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="aNi"><i>aNi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="ari"><i>ari</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="iri"><i>iri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="goNumuri"><i>goNumuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="caMdihidi"><i>caMdihidi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="cigi"><i>cigi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="jagi"><i>jagi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="jadi"><i>jadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="jigi"><i>jigi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="wukkuhidi"><i>wukkuhidi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="wudi"><i>wudi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="wuri"><i>wuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="wulYi"><i>wulYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="wUpiri"><i>wUpiri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="xahisi"><i>xahisi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="natikeVmuri"><i>natikeVmuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="nali"><i>nali</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="kikkiri"><i>kikkiri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="badi"><i>badi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="bAyalYi"><i>bAyalYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="bAyibadi"><i>bAyibadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="bAlabadi"><i>bAlabadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="bigi"><i>bigi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="biri"><i>biri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="alYi"><i>alYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="masibalYi"><i>masibalYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="midi"><i>midi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mixi"><i>mixi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="muMxari"><i>muMxari</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mudi"><i>mudi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="muni"><i>muni</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="muri"><i>muri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="mulYi"><i>mulYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="latikeVmuri"><i>latikeVmuri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="savi"><i>savi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="sigi"><i>sigi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="suri"><i>suri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="suli"><i>suli</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="sulYi"><i>sulYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="haNi"><i>haNi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hallukadi"><i>hallukadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hasi"><i>hasi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="halYi"><i>halYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hAyi"><i>hAyi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hiri"><i>hiri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hisi"><i>hisi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hilYi"><i>hilYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hugi"><i>hugi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="huttalYi"><i>huttalYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="huri"><i>huri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="husi"><i>husi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hulYi"><i>hulYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hoVtteVkadi"><i>hoVtteVkadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="hoVli"><i>hoVli</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="ilYi"><i>ilYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="ugi"><i>ugi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="udi"><i>udi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="uri"><i>uri</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="uli"><i>uli</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="ulYi"><i>ulYi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="oVli"><i>oVli</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
<e lm="kadi"><i>kadi</i><par n="kudi/_v"/></e>
